Massachusetts, session 194th, S2209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 45 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting the following new subsection:-
(n) The state secretary shall automatically disqualify any person, organization or other
entity adjudicated to have engaged in an unlawful practice under section 4 of chapter 151B from
acting or registering as an executive or legislative agent for a period of 4 years from the date of
final determination.
An organization or other entity that discriminates against its members on the basis of a
protected class set forth in said chapter 151B, notwithstanding the absence of an employment
relationship, shall be similarly disqualified from acting or registering as an executive or
legislative agent for a period of 4 years from the date of final determination. The secretary shall
establish an adjudicatory process to receive and review complaints of such discrimination.
of 1